Hawaii statutes.
[§708-835.55] Theft; agricultural product;
sentencing. (1) Whenever a person is sentenced under sections 708-830.5,
708‑831, 708-832, or 708‑833, for an offense involving theft of an
agricultural product or commodity, in addition to any penalty prescribed by
those sections, the person shall be required to make payment to the property
owner for:

(a) The value of the stolen agricultural product or
commodity, pursuant to section 706-646; and

(b) The cost of
replanting the agricultural product or commodity.

(2) For
purposes of this section, "agricultural product or commodity"
includes:

(a) Floricultural, horticultural, viticultural,
aquacultural, forestry products or commodities; and

(b) Shrubbery, nuts, coffee, seeds, and other farm
or plantation products or commodities,

whether for personal or commercial use. [L 2012, c
125, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §708-835.55

Act 125, Session Laws 2012, added this section, requiring
persons sentenced for theft in the first, second, third, or fourth degree for
an offense involving theft of an agricultural product or commodity to pay
restitution to the victim in an amount equal to the value of what was stolen
and the cost of replanting. The legislature found that agricultural theft
continues to be a significant problem in the State and has resulted in millions
of dollars in losses for the agricultural industry. The legislature further
found that existing laws were not stringent enough to deter potential thieves.
Act 125 would allow prosecutors to develop stronger cases against thieves of
agricultural products and commodities. Senate Standing Committee Report No.
2289, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3322.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next